Maine, session 132, LD1563.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA c. 39 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 39
LEGISLATIVE DRAFTING STANDARDS
§1051. Content standards for legislation
All legislation drafted for introduction to the Legislature must be written in a manner
that allows it to become law if not amended and may not be an abstract or concept of the
intent of the legislation. Legislation that does not comply with this section may not be
referred to a committee of the Legislature for a hearing.